California statutes. Elections Code
(5) If the petition does not include the disclosure statement described by subdivision (b) of Section 107, the following text on a separate horizontal line below the signer’s printed name and above the signer’s signature: “DO NOT SIGN UNLESS you have seen Official Top Funders sheet and its month is still valid.” The text “DO NOT SIGN UNLESS” shall be in all capitals and in boldface. The other text shall be capitalized as shown and shall not be in boldface.

(b) Only a person who is a qualified registered voter at the time of signing the petition is entitled to sign it.

(c) The number of signatures attached to each section shall be at the pleasure of the
 person soliciting the signatures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 887, Sec. 5.   (SB 1360)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

9021.

(a) A person who meets the requirements of Section 102 may circulate a statewide initiative or referendum petition anywhere within the state. Each section of the petition shall bear the name of a county or city and county, and only qualified registered voters of that county or city and county may sign that section.

(b) The circulator may sign the section he or she is circulating as provided in Section 106.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 278, Sec. 18.   (SB 213)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

9022.

(a) Each section shall have attached thereto the declaration of the person soliciting the signatures setting forth the information required by Section 104.

(b) The circulator shall certify to the content of the declaration as to its truth and correctness, under penalty of perjury under the laws of the State of California, with the signature of his or her name. The circulator shall state the date and the place of execution on the declaration immediately preceding his or her signature.

(c) Another declaration shall not be required.

(d) Petitions so verified shall be
 prima facie evidence that the signatures are genuine and that the persons signing are qualified voters. Unless and until otherwise proven upon official investigation, it shall be presumed that the petition presented contains the signatures of the requisite number of qualified voters.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 278, Sec. 19.   (SB 213)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Filing Petitions [9030. - 9035.]

9030.

(a) Each section of the petition shall be filed with the elections official of the county or city and county for which it was circulated, but all sections circulated in any county or city and county shall be filed at the same time. Once filed, no petition section shall be amended except by order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

(b) Within eight days after the filing of the petition, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, the elections official shall determine the total number of signatures affixed to the petition and shall transmit this information to the
 Secretary of State. If the total number of signatures filed with all elections officials is less than 100 percent of the number of qualified voters required to find the petition sufficient, the Secretary of State shall so notify the proponents and the elections officials, and no further action shall be taken with regard to the petition.

(c) If the number of signatures filed with all elections officials is 100 percent or more of the number of qualified voters needed to declare the petition sufficient, the Secretary of State shall immediately so notify the elections officials.

(d) Within 30 days after this notification, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, the elections official shall determine the number of qualified voters who have signed the petition. If more than 500 names have been signed on sections of the petition filed with an elections official, the elections
 official shall use a random sampling technique for verification of signatures, as determined by the Secretary of State. The random sample of signatures to be verified shall be drawn in such a manner that every signature filed with the elections official shall be given an equal opportunity to be included in the sample. The random sampling shall include an examination of at least 500 or 3 percent of the signatures, whichever is greater. In determining from the records of registration what number of qualified voters have signed the petition, the elections official may use any facsimiles of voters’ signatures provided that the method of preparing and displaying the facsimiles complies with law. A signature shall not be invalidated because of a variation of the signature caused by the substitution of initials for the first or middle name, or both, of the person signing the petition.

(e) The elections official, upon the completion of the examination, shall immediately attach to the petition, except the signatures thereto appended, a properly dated certificate, showing the result of the examination, and shall immediately transmit the petition and the certificate to the Secretary of State. A copy of this certificate shall be filed in the elections official’s office.

(f) If the certificates received from all elections officials by the Secretary of State establish that the number of valid signatures does not equal 95 percent of the number of qualified voters needed to find the petition sufficient, the petition shall be deemed to have failed to qualify, and the Secretary of State shall immediately so notify the proponents and the elections officials.

(g) If the certificates received from all elections
 officials by the Secretary of State total more than 110 percent of the number of qualified voters needed to find the petition sufficient, the Secretary of State shall certify that the measure is qualified for the ballot as provided in Section 9033.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 562, Sec. 6.1.   (AB 1829)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

9031.

(a) If the statistical sampling shows that the number of valid signatures is within 95 to 110 percent of the number of signatures of qualified voters needed to declare the petition sufficient, the Secretary of State shall order the examination and verification of the signatures filed, and shall so notify the elections officials. A signature shall not be invalidated because of a variation of the signature caused by the substitution of initials for the first or middle name, or both, of the person signing the petition.

(b) Within 60 days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, after receipt of the order, the elections official or registrar of voters shall determine from the records of
 registration what number of qualified voters have signed the petition, and if necessary the board of supervisors shall allow the elections official or registrar additional assistance for the purpose of examining the petition and provide for their compensation. In determining from the records of registration what number of qualified voters have signed the petition, the elections official or registrar of voters may use any file or list of registered voters maintained by their office, or the facsimiles of voters’ signatures, provided that the method of preparing and displaying the facsimiles complies with law.

(c) (1) During the examination and verification of the signatures filed, the elections official or registrar of voters shall submit one or more reports to the Secretary of State showing the number of
 signatures of qualified voters that have been verified as of that date. The Secretary of State shall determine the number of reports required to be submitted and the manner of their submission.

(2) The Secretary of State shall maintain a list indicating the number of verified signatures of qualified voters who have signed the petition based on the most recent reports submitted pursuant to paragraph (1). If the Secretary of State determines, prior to each county’s completing the examination of each signature filed, that based on the list the petition is signed by the requisite number of voters needed to declare the petition sufficient, the Secretary of State shall immediately notify the elections official or registrar of voters of every county or city and county in the state of this fact. Immediately after receipt of this
 notification, the elections official or registrar of voters may suspend signature verification until receipt of a certificate pursuant to Section 9033 or until otherwise instructed by the Secretary of State.

(d) The elections official or registrar, upon the completion of the examination or notification pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), shall immediately attach to the petition, except the signatures thereto appended, an amended certificate properly dated, showing the result of the examination and shall immediately transmit the petition, together with the amended certificate, to the Secretary of State. A copy of the amended certificate shall be filed in the elections official’s office.

(e) (1) If the amended certificates establish the petition’s sufficiency,
 the Secretary of State shall certify that the measure is qualified for the ballot as provided in Section 9033.

(2) If the amended certificates received from all elections officials by the Secretary of State establish that the petition has still been found insufficient, the Secretary of State shall immediately so notify the proponents and the elections officials.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 870, Sec. 1.   (SB 386)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9032.

The right to file the petition shall be reserved to its proponents, and any section thereof presented for filing by any person or persons other than the proponents of a measure or by persons duly authorized in writing by one or more of the proponents shall be disregarded by the elections official.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9033.

(a) When the Secretary of State has received from one or more elections officials or registrars a petition, certified to have been signed by the requisite number of qualified voters, the Secretary of State shall forthwith notify the proponents and immediately transmit to the elections official or registrar of voters of every county or city and county in the state a notice directing that signature verification be terminated.

(b) (1) In the case of an initiative measure, the Secretary of State shall identify the date of the next statewide general election as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 9016, or the next special statewide election, that will occur not less than 131 days after the date the Secretary of State receives a petition certified
 to have been signed by the requisite number of qualified voters.

(2) On the 131st day prior to the date of the election identified pursuant to paragraph (1), the Secretary of State shall do all of the following:

(A) Issue a certificate of qualification certifying that the initiative measure, as of that date, is qualified for the ballot at the election identified pursuant to paragraph (1).

(B) Notify the proponents of the initiative measure and the elections official of each county that the measure, as of that date, is qualified for the ballot at the election identified pursuant to paragraph (1).

(C) Include the initiative measure in a list of all statewide initiative measures that are eligible to be placed on the ballot at the election identified
 pursuant to paragraph (1) and publish the list on the Secretary of State’s internet website.

(3) Upon the issuance of a certificate of qualification pursuant to paragraph (2), an initiative measure shall be deemed qualified for the ballot for purposes of subdivision (c) of Section 8 of Article II of the California Constitution.

(c) (1) In the case of a referendum measure, the Secretary of State shall identify the date of the next statewide general election as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 9016, or the next special statewide election, that will occur not less than 31 days after the date the Secretary of State receives a petition certified to have been signed by the requisite number of qualified voters.

(2) On the 131st day prior to the date of the election identified pursuant to paragraph
 (1), or upon receipt of a petition certified to have been signed by the requisite number of qualified voters if fewer than 131 days remain until the election identified pursuant to paragraph (1), the Secretary of State shall do all of the following:

(A) Issue a certificate of qualification certifying that the referendum measure, as of that date, is qualified for the ballot at the election identified pursuant to paragraph (1).

(B) Notify the proponents of the referendum measure and the elections official of each county that the measure, as of that date, is qualified for the ballot at the election identified pursuant to paragraph (1).

(C) Include the referendum measure in a list of all statewide referendum measures that are eligible to be placed on the ballot at the election identified pursuant to paragraph (1) and
 publish the list on the Secretary of State’s internet website.

(3) Upon the issuance of a certificate of qualification pursuant to paragraph (1), a referendum measure shall be deemed qualified for the ballot for purposes of subdivision (c) of Section 9 of Article II of the California Constitution.

(4) If a referendum measure has been issued a certificate of qualification as of the effective date of the act adding this paragraph but has not yet appeared on the ballot, the Secretary of State shall void that certificate of qualification, and shall issue a new certificate of qualification pursuant to the provisions of this subdivision. The proponents of any such referendum measure shall be permitted to withdraw that measure pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 9604 at any time between the effective date of the act adding this paragraph and the date on which the Secretary of State
 issues a new certificate of qualification in accordance with subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of this subdivision.

(d) In the case of a referendum measure, upon the Secretary of State’s transmission of notification to the proponents and elections officials under subdivision (c) of Section 9030 that the number of signatures filed with all elections officials is 100 percent or more of the number of qualified voters needed to declare the petition sufficient, the statute that is the subject of the referendum measure shall cease to have effect unless and until one of the following occurs:

(1) The Secretary of State or a court of competent jurisdiction concludes that the petition was not signed by the requisite number of qualified voters.

(2) The proponents of the referendum measure withdraw the measure under Section
 9604.

(3) The voters vote to keep the statute that is the subject of the referendum at the statewide election in which the referendum measure appears on the ballot.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 162, Sec. 4.   (AB 421)   Effective September 8, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

9034.

(a) The proponents of a proposed initiative measure shall submit a certification, signed under penalty of perjury, to the Secretary of State immediately upon the collection of 25 percent of the number of signatures needed to qualify the initiative measure for the ballot.

(b) Upon the receipt of the certification required by subdivision (a), the Secretary of State shall transmit copies of the initiative measure, together with the circulating title and summary as prepared by the Attorney General pursuant to Section 9004, to the Senate and the Assembly. Each house shall assign the initiative measure to its appropriate committees. The appropriate committees shall hold joint public hearings on the subject of the measure not later
 than 131 days before the date of the election at which the measure is to be voted upon.

(c) This section shall not be construed as authority for the Legislature to alter the initiative measure or prevent it from appearing on the ballot.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 697, Sec. 12.   (SB 1253)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

9035.

An initiative measure may be proposed by presenting to the Secretary of State a petition that sets forth the text of the proposed statute or amendment to the Constitution and is certified to have been signed by registered voters equal in number to 5 percent in the case of a statute, and 8 percent in the case of an amendment to the Constitution, of the voters for all candidates for Governor at the last gubernatorial election preceding the issuance of the circulating title and summary for the initiative measure by the Attorney General.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 373, Sec. 30.   (AB 753)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Measures Proposed by the Legislature [9040. - 9044.]

9040.

(a) Every constitutional amendment, bond measure, or other legislative measure submitted to the people by the Legislature shall appear on the ballot of the first statewide election occurring at least 131 days after the adoption of the proposal by the Legislature.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the Legislature may specify, in the text of a measure that proposes an amendment or revision of the Constitution, that the constitutional amendment or revision submitted to the people shall appear on the ballot at a statewide election other than the election specified in subdivision (a), if the election specified in the measure would occur at least 131 days after adoption of the measure by the
 Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 449, Sec. 1.   (SB 863)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

9041.

Whenever the Legislature submits any measure to the voters of the state, the author of the measure and no more than two persons appointed by the author may draft an argument for the adoption of the measure, or the author of the measure may appoint no more than three persons to draft the argument. In no case shall more than three persons write the argument. This argument shall not exceed 500 words in length.

If the author of the measure desires separate arguments to be written in its favor by each person appointed, separate arguments may be written, but the combined length of the arguments shall not exceed 500 words.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9042.

If a measure submitted to the voters by the Legislature was not adopted unanimously, one Member of the Senate who voted against it shall be appointed by the President pro Tempore of the Senate and one Member of the Assembly who voted against it shall be appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly, at the same time as appointments to draft an argument in its favor are made, to write an argument against the measure. An argument shall not exceed 500 words.

If those members appointed to write an argument against the measure choose, each may write a separate argument opposing it, but the combined length of the two arguments shall not exceed 500 words.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 22, Sec. 58.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

9043.

Arguments prepared by legislators and their appointees shall be submitted to the Secretary of State no later than a date to be designated by the Secretary of State. The arguments may not be amended or changed after submission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9044.

If an argument for or an argument against a measure submitted to the voters by the Legislature has not been filed by a Member of the Legislature, any voter may request the Secretary of State’s permission to prepare and file an argument for either side, on which no argument has been prepared by a Member of the Legislature. The Secretary of State shall grant permission unless two or more voters request permission to submit arguments on the same side of a measure, in which event the Secretary of State shall designate one of the voters to write the argument. Any argument prepared pursuant to this section shall be submitted to the Secretary of State by a date sufficient to meet ballot printing deadlines.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Ballot Titles [9050. - 9054.]

9050.

(a) After the Secretary of State determines that a measure will appear on the ballot at the next statewide election, the Secretary of State shall promptly transmit a copy of the measure to the Attorney General. The Attorney General shall provide and return to the Secretary of State a ballot title and summary, as described in subdivision (b) of Section 303.5, and the condensed ballot title and summary prepared pursuant to Section 303 for each measure submitted to the voters of the whole state by a date sufficient to meet the state voter information guide public display deadlines.

(b) (1) For each statewide initiative measure, or measure proposed by the
 Legislature, within one week after receiving the lists of supporters and opponents of a measure, the Secretary of State shall provide to county elections officials the ballot label, consisting of the condensed title and summary prepared by the Attorney General followed by the list of supporters and opponents, pursuant to Section 303.1.

(2) For each statewide referendum measure, the Secretary of State shall provide to county elections officials the ballot label, consisting of the condensed title and summary prepared by the Attorney General. Commencing January 1, 2025, the condensed title and summary shall be followed by a listing of the names of supporters and opponents in the ballot arguments printed in the state voter information guide as described in subdivision (c) of Section 9051.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 39.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

9051.

(a) (1) The ballot title and summary may differ from the legislative, circulating, or other title and summary of the measure and shall not exceed 100 words, not including the fiscal impact statement.

(2) The ballot title and summary shall include a summary of the Legislative Analyst’s estimate of the net state and local government fiscal impact prepared pursuant to Section 9087 of this code and Section 88003 of the Government Code.

(b) (1) The condensed ballot title and summary for a statewide initiative measure, or measure proposed by the Legislature, shall not contain more than 75 words
 and shall be a condensed version of the ballot title and summary including the financial impact summary prepared pursuant to Section 9087 of this code and Section 88003 of the Government Code.

(2) The condensed title and summary for a statewide referendum measure shall not contain more than 75 words, including the ballot title that shall be in the form of a question as specified in Section 303.1.

(c) (1) The ballot label for a statewide initiative measure, or measure proposed by the Legislature, shall include the condensed ballot title and summary described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), followed by the following:

(A) After the text “Supporters:”, a listing of nonprofit organizations,
 businesses, or individuals taken from the signers or the text of the argument in favor of the ballot measure printed in the state voter information guide. The list of supporters shall not exceed 125 characters in length. Each supporter shall be separated by a semicolon. A nonprofit organization, business, or individual shall not be listed unless they support the ballot measure.

(B) After the text “Opponents:”, a listing of nonprofit organizations, businesses, or individuals taken from the signers or the text of the argument against the ballot measure printed in the state voter information guide. The list of opponents shall not exceed 125 characters in length. Each opponent shall be separated by a semicolon. A nonprofit organization, business, or individual shall not be listed unless they oppose the ballot measure.

(C) A supporter or opponent shall not be listed pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B) unless it is one of the following:

(i) A nonprofit organization that was not originally created as a committee described in Section 82013 of the Government Code, that has been in existence for at least four years, and that, during the four-year period prior to the time that the organization is listed pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B), either has received contributions from more than 500 donors or has had at least one full-time employee.

(ii) A business that has been in existence for at least four years and that has had at least one full-time employee during the four-year period prior to the time that the organization is listed pursuant
 to subparagraph (A) or (B).

(iii) A current or former elected official, who may be listed with the official’s title (e.g., “State Senator Mary Smith,” “Assembly Member Carlos Garcia,” or “former Eureka City Council Member Amy Lee”). These titles may be shortened (e.g. “Senator” or “Sen.” for “State Senator” or “Asm.” for “Assembly Member”).

(iv) An individual who is not a current or former elected official may be listed only with the individual’s first and last name and an honorific (e.g., “Dr.,” “M.D.,” “Ph.D.,” or “Esquire”), with no other title or designation, unless it is a title representing a nonprofit organization or business that meets the requirements of clause (i) or (ii) and that is eligible to be listed under subparagraph (A) if the individual supports the ballot measure or
 under subparagraph (B) if the individual opposes the ballot measure.

(D) Spaces, commas, semicolons, and any other characters count towards the 125-character limit in subparagraphs (A) and (B).

(E) A supporter or opponent shall not be listed pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B) if the supporter or opponent is a political party or is representing a political party.

(F) The name of a nonprofit organization or business included in the list of supporters and opponents as required by this subdivision may be shortened by the proponents or opponents who submit it using acronyms, abbreviations, or by leaving out words in the entity’s name, as long as doing so would not confuse voters with another well-known organization or business
 that did not take the same position on the ballot measure (e.g., “Hot Air Balloon Flyers of Montana Education Fund” may be shortened to “Hot Air Balloons Montana”).

(G) Supporters and opponents listed on the ballot label pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B) shall be added as text after the condensed ballot title and summary and shall be separated by semicolons. Supporters and opponents need not be displayed on separate horizontal lines on the ballot. If no list of supporters is provided by the proponents or there are none that meet the requirements of this section, then “Supporters:” shall be followed by “None submitted.” If no list of opponents is provided by the opponents or there are none that meet the requirements of this section, then “Opponents:” shall be followed by “None submitted.”

(H) If the ballot emphasizes the text “Supporters:” or “Opponents:” by use of boldface font, underlining, or any other method that differentiates that text from the list of supporters or opponents that follow, the text “Supporters:” or “Opponents:” may be displayed with only the initial letter capitalized. If that text is not emphasized, then each letter of that text shall be capitalized.

(I) If including the list of Supporters and Opponents in the ballot labels as required by this section would necessitate the printing of an extra ballot card compared to the ballot labels not including them, the type size of the part of all of the ballot labels starting with “Supporters:” may be reduced by the minimal amount needed to stop them from necessitating an extra ballot card, as long as the type size is no smaller than 8-point and as long as
 the type size is reduced by the same amount for all ballot measures.

(2) (A) The proponents of a statewide initiative measure or measure proposed by the Legislature, or, commencing January 1, 2025, the supporters of the statute subject to a statewide referendum, shall provide the list of supporters described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) to the Secretary of State when submitting the arguments supporting the ballot measure.

(i) For every supporter listed that is a nonprofit organization, a business, or an individual whose title includes a nonprofit organization or business, the supporters shall include a signed statement by a representative of the nonprofit organization or business, under penalty of perjury, that includes its name and business address
 and that attests (I) that the nonprofit organization or business supports the measure, (II) that the nonprofit organization or business has been in existence for at least four years, (III) that the nonprofit organization or business has had at least one full-time employee for the last four years, or, if it is a nonprofit organization, that it has had at least 500 donors in the last four years, and (IV) that it was not originally created as a committee described in Section 82013 of the Government Code.

(ii) For every supporter listed that is an individual, the proponents shall include a signed statement by the individual that includes the individual’s name and address and attests that the individual supports the measure.

(B) The opponents of a statewide initiative measure or measure proposed
 by the Legislature, or, commencing January 1, 2025, the opponents of the statute subject to a statewide referendum, shall provide the list of opponents described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) to the Secretary of State when submitting the arguments opposing the ballot measure.

(i) For every opponent listed that is a nonprofit organization, a business, or an individual whose title includes a nonprofit organization or business, the opponents shall include a signed statement by a representative of the nonprofit organization or business, under penalty of perjury, that includes its name and business address and that attests (I) that the nonprofit organization or business opposes the measure, (II) that the nonprofit organization or business has been in existence for at least four years, (III) that the nonprofit organization or business has had
 at least one full-time employee for the last four years, or, if it is a nonprofit organization, that it has had at least 500 donors in the last four years, and (IV) that it was not originally created as a committee described in Section 82013 of the Government Code.

(ii) For every opponent listed that is an individual, the opponents shall include a signed statement by the individual that includes the individual’s name and address and attests that the individual opposes the measure.

(C) In order to enable the Secretary of State to determine whether the nonprofit organizations and businesses listed in the supporters or opponents have been in existence for at least four years, the proponents and opponents shall submit with the list of supporters and opponents described in
 subparagraphs (A) and (B) a certified copy of the articles of incorporation, articles of organization, or similar document for each nonprofit organization or business on the list that verifies that the nonprofit organization or business has been in existence for at least four years.

(D) The Secretary of State shall confirm that a submission listing supporters or opponents includes the documentation required by subparagraphs (A) through (C) and otherwise meets the requirements of this section. The Secretary of State shall ask the proponents or opponents to resubmit a list if the requirements are not met. The Secretary of State may establish deadlines by when proponents or opponents must resubmit a list and any other documents required by the Secretary of State to meet the deadline in subdivision (b) of Section 9050.

(d) (1) Commencing January 1, 2025, the ballot label for a statewide referendum measure shall include the condensed title and summary described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), followed by a listing of the names of supporters and opponents in the ballot arguments printed in the state voter information guide as described in subdivision (c).

(2) For purposes of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), “Supporters” shall be listed on the ballot label as “Supporters of the law” for statewide referendum measures.

(3) For purposes of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), “Opponents” shall be listed on the ballot label as “Opponents of the law” for statewide referendum
 measures.

(e) In providing the ballot title and summary, the Attorney General shall give a true and impartial statement of the purpose of the measure in such language that the ballot title and summary shall neither be an argument, nor be likely to create prejudice, for or against the proposed measure.

(f) The Attorney General shall invite and consider public comment in preparing each ballot title and summary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 40.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

9053.

Each measure shall be designated on the ballot by the ballot label certified by the Secretary of State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 751, Sec. 6.   (AB 1416)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

9054.

(a) Whenever a city, county, or city and county is required by Section 203 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10503) or Section 4(f)(4) (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10303(f)(4)) of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 to provide a translation of ballot materials in a language other than English, the Secretary of State shall provide a translation of the ballot title and summary prepared pursuant to Sections 9050 and 9051 and of the ballot label prepared pursuant to Section 13247 in that language to the city, county, or city and county for each state measure submitted to the voters in a statewide election not later than 68 days before that election.

(b) When preparing a translation in a language other than English
 pursuant to subdivision (a), the Secretary of State shall consult with an advisory body consisting of language experts and nonpartisan organizations that advocate on behalf of, or provide services to, individuals that speak that language.

(c) All translations prepared pursuant to this section shall be made available for public examination in the same time and manner as the state voter information guide is made available for public examination in accordance with Section 88006 of the Government Code and Section 9092 of this code.

(d) The local elections official shall use that translation of the ballot label on the state voter information guide and the official ballot and may not select or contract with another person to provide translations of the same
 text.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 422, Sec. 18.   (AB 2911)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Arguments Concerning Measures Submitted to Voters [9060. - 9069.]

9060.

In case either the argument for or the argument against any measure placed on the ballot is not prepared and filed, the Secretary of State shall, by a general press release, request voters to submit arguments.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9061.

The press release shall be mailed at least 120 days prior to the date of the election at which a measure is to be voted upon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 345, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

9062.

The press release shall consist of an announcement containing:

(a) A summary of the essential nature or purpose of the measure for or against which no argument has been prepared or filed.

(b) A statement that the affirmative or negative arguments, or both, have not been filed.

(c) An invitation to any voter or group of voters to submit and file with the Secretary of State, within the time limit, arguments for or against the measure as to which affirmative or negative arguments have not been filed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9063.

The summary of a measure given in the press release shall be the official circulating title and summary that has been prepared by the Attorney General. The Legislative Counsel Bureau shall prepare the summary on all other measures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 373, Sec. 37.   (AB 753)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

9064.

Any voter or group of voters may, at any time within the time limit, prepare and file with the Secretary of State an argument for or against any measure as to which arguments have not been prepared or filed. This argument shall not exceed 500 words in length.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9065.

A ballot argument shall not be accepted under this article unless accompanied by all of the following:

(a) The name, business or home address, and telephone number of each person submitting the argument.

(b) If the argument is submitted on behalf of an organization, the name, business address, and telephone number of the organization and of at least two of its principal officers.

(c) The name, business or home address, and telephone number of a contact person for each individual or organization submitting the argument.

(d) If the argument is signed by anyone other than the proponent or legislative author, the name and official title of the person or persons authorized by the proponent to sign the argument.

(e) The signed statement required by Section 9600.

(f) No person signing an argument for or against a measure or a rebuttal to an argument for or against a measure may identify himself or herself in reference to that signature as a candidate for any office.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9067.

(a) If more than one argument for, or more than one argument against, a measure is filed within the time prescribed, the Secretary of State shall select one of the arguments for printing in the state voter information guide. In selecting the argument the Secretary of State shall give preference and priority in the order named to the arguments of the following:

(1) In the case of a measure submitted by the Legislature, Members of the Legislature.

(2) In the case of an initiative or referendum measure, the proponent of the measure.

(3) Bona fide associations of citizens.

(4) Individual voters.

(b) In order to enable the Secretary of State to determine whether it qualifies as a bona fide association of citizens, an organization or association submitting an argument for or against a measure shall submit with its argument a copy of one of the following:

(1) Its articles of incorporation, articles of association, partnership documents, bylaws, or similar documents.

(2) Letterhead containing the name of the organization and its principal officers.

(3) If the organization or association is a primarily formed committee established to support or oppose the measure, its statement of organization filed pursuant to Section 84101 of the Government Code.
